Utah statutes.
63F-1-702.   Notice and training by the Division of Archives and Records Service.

(1)  The division shall provide notice of the provisions and requirements of this chapter to all public bodies that are subject to the provision of Subsection 52-4-202(3)(a)(ii).

(2)  The division shall, as necessary, provide periodic training on the use of the Utah Public Notice Website to public bodies that are authorized to post notice on the website.

